Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 1. Crimes by Prisoners.

§ 53.1-203.
Felonies by prisoners; penalties.

It shall be unlawful for a prisoner in a state, local or community correctional facility or in the custody of an employee thereof to:

Escape from a correctional facility or from any person in charge of such prisoner;

Willfully break, cut or damage any building, furniture, fixture or fastening of such facility or any part thereof for the purpose of escaping, aiding any other prisoner to escape therefrom or rendering such facility less secure as a place of confinement;

Make, procure, secrete or have in his possession any instrument, tool or other thing for the purpose of escaping from or aiding another to escape from a correctional facility or employee thereof;

Make, procure, secrete or have in his possession a knife, instrument, tool or other thing not authorized by the superintendent or sheriff which is capable of causing death or bodily injury;

Procure, sell, secrete or have in his possession any chemical compound which he has not lawfully received;

Procure, sell, secrete or have in his possession a controlled substance classified in Schedule III of the Drug Control Act (§

54.1-3400

et seq.) or marijuana;

Introduce into a correctional facility or have in his possession firearms or ammunition for firearms;

Willfully burn or destroy by use of any explosive device or substance, in whole or in part, or cause to be so burned or destroyed, any personal property, within any correctional facility;

Willfully tamper with, damage, destroy, or disable any fire protection or fire suppression system, equipment, or sprinklers within any correctional facility; or

Conspire with another prisoner or other prisoners to commit any of the foregoing acts.

For violation of any of the provisions of this section, except subdivision 6, the prisoner shall be guilty of a Class 6 felony. For a violation of subdivision 6, he shall be guilty of a Class 5 felony. If the violation is of subdivision 1 of this section and the escapee is a felon, he shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum term of confinement of one year, which shall be served consecutively with any other sentence. The prisoner shall, upon conviction of escape, immediately commence to serve such escape sentence, and he shall not be eligible for parole during such period. Any prisoner sentenced to life imprisonment who escapes shall not be eligible for parole. No part of the time served for escape shall be credited for the purpose of parole toward the sentence or sentences, the service of which is interrupted for service of the escape sentence, nor shall it be credited for such purpose toward any other sentence.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-291; 1966, c. 300; 1970, c. 648; 1973, c. 403; 1975, c. 588; 1977, c. 497; 1978, cc. 177, 361; 1982, c. 636; 1985, c. 555; 1988, c. 371; 2004, c. 461; 2006, c. 104; 2011, cc. 384, 410; 2014, cc. 674, 719.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 5 and Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

As to bodily injuries caused by prisoners, state juvenile probationers and state and local adult probationers or adult parolees, see §

18.2-55

.

As to escape of prisoners, see also §§

18.2-477

through

18.2-480

.

As to testimony regarding identification of controlled substances, see §

19.2-188.1

.

For definition of “barrier crime” and national criminal background checks by businesses and organizations regarding employees or volunteers providing care to children or the elderly or disabled, see §

19.2-392.02

.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 461, in the last paragraph, in the third sentence, substituted “mandatory minimum term of confinement of one year” for “minimum of one year’s confinement” and “shall be served consecutively” for “sentence shall not be suspended, in whole or in part, nor served concurrently.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 104 added subdivision 9; redesignated former subdivision 9 as subdivision 10; and made a related change.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 384 and 410, effective March 23, 2011, are identical, and inserted “synthetic cannabinoids as defined in §

18.2-248.1:1

” and made a related change in subdivision 6.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 674 and 719 are identical, and deleted “or synthetic cannabinoids as defined in §

18.2-248.1:1

” following “marijuana” at the end of subdivision 6 and made a stylistic change.

Law Review.

For article on due process implications of prison transfers, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 583 (1982).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4A M.J. Conspiracy, § 2; 4C M.J. Constitutional Law, §§ 128, 141; 6B M.J. Drugs & Druggists, § 5; 7A M.J. Escape, § 1; 9A M.J. Habeas Corpus, § 11; 14A M.J. Pardon, Probation and Parole, § 5; 14B M.J. Prisons and Prisoners, § 10.

§ 53.1-204.
If prisoner commits any other felony, how punished.

If a prisoner in a state, local or community correctional facility or in the custody of an employee thereof commits any felony other than those specified in §§

18.2-31

,

18.2-55

and

53.1-203

, which is punishable by confinement in a state correctional facility, such prisoner shall be subject to the same punishment therefor as if he were not a prisoner.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-294; 1970, c. 648; 1975, c. 588; 1982, c. 636; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344, 345.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and 345, cl. 3 provides: “That any person under a sentence of death imposed for an offense committed prior to July 1, 2021, but who has not been executed by July 1, 2021, shall have his sentence changed to life imprisonment, and such person who was 18 years of age or older at the time of the offense shall not be eligible for (i) parole, (ii) any good conduct allowance or any earned sentence credits under Chapter 6 (§

53.1-186

et seq.) of Title 53.1 of the Code of Virginia, or (iii) conditional release pursuant to §

53.1-40.01

or

53.1-40.02

of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and 345, cl. 4 provides: “That notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person may be sentenced to death or put to death on or after the effective date of this act [July 1, 2021] for any violation of law.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and 345, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $77,376 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 344 and 345, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and deleted “or by death” preceding “such prisoner.”

Law Review.

For article on due process implications of prison transfers, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 583 (1982).

§ 53.1-205.
Jurisdiction for trial of prisoners; nature of proceedings.

Subject to the provisions of §§

53.1-203

and

53.1-204

, the jurisdiction, proceedings, trial and judgment in a criminal proceeding against a person confined in a state correctional facility shall be as is provided for in other cases of criminal prosecution.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 53-295, 53-300; 1966, c. 430; 1970, c. 593; 1973, c. 59; 1982, c. 636.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on criminal procedure for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1478 (1973).